Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-229
Authority; quorum; vacancy; effect.

The powers of the authority shall be vested in the members. Five members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. The affirmative vote of at least five members shall be necessary for any action to be taken by the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the authority.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 29;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 31.